Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-906
Lease; application; form; contents.

Applications for the issuance of any lease authorized by sections 72-901 to 72-912 shall be executed under oath by the applicant, applicant's agent or attorney, or an officer or agent of a corporation if the application is made by a corporation. The form of the application shall be prescribed by the Board of Educational Lands and Funds, and shall contain a description of the land, by legal subdivisions, upon which the lease is desired, and the terms upon which the applicant desires to acquire such lease.

Laws 1943, c. 164, § 6, p. 581;

R.S.1943, § 72-906.